Hawaii statutes.
§660-12 By supreme court; to whom
returnable. Whenever the writ or order to show cause is issued by the
supreme court or a justice thereof, it may be made returnable before the
supreme court or a circuit court. [L 1870, c 32, §8; am L 1903, c 79, §2; RL
1925, §2735; RL 1935, §4320; RL 1945, §10361; am L 1953, c 101, §8; RL 1955,
§239-12; HRS §660-12; am L 1972, c 90, §5(f)]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next